Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 401.025.
(b) “Maintain” means to repair, perform upkeep on and otherwise keep in  good working
condition.
(c) “Preparedness equipment” means equipment, vehicles or other  personal property
that:
(A) May be used to decrease the risk to life and property resulting from an emergency;
and
(B) Qualifies as a capital asset eligible for financing with tax-exempt bonds.
(d) “Qualified applicant” means an entity that has responsibility  for or expertise in
emergency preparedness and that is a local government, a  special government body or a
private organization qualified for federal tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(e) “Recipient” means an entity that  applies for and receives preparedness equipment,
or funds to purchase preparedness equipment,  under the grant program described in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(f) “Tax-exempt bond” means a bond, as  defined in ORS 286A.001, the receipt of interest
on which is excluded from gross income under the Internal  Revenue Code or that is eligible
for a federal interest subsidy payment or other tax-advantaged status.
(2)(a) Before December  31, 2017, the Oregon Homeland Security Council shall develop a
list of preparedness equipment that is needed throughout this state to address deficiencies
in the ability of the state to respond to local and regional emergencies.
(b) In developing the list, the council shall consult and coordinate with the Office  of
Emergency Management and with county officials who  are responsible for emergency man-
agement.
(c) The council shall assign a  priority level to each type of preparedness equipment on
the list, taking into consideration, without limitation, the types of emergency that are  most
likely to occur  in different regions of this state and the types of preparedness equipment that
offer the highest ratio  of utility to cost. The council shall periodically update and revise the
list.
Enrolled House Bill 2687 (HB 2687-A) Page 1
(3) The Office of  Emergency Management shall develop and administer a grant program
to distribute preparedness equipment, or funds to purchase  preparedness equipment, to re-
cipients throughout this state. Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) Qualified applicants may request preparedness equipment that is identified on the list
described in subsection (2) of this section. Applicants must  demonstrate a need for the spe-
cific preparedness equipment requested, the  ability to maintain the preparedness equipment
and the ability to  use the preparedness equipment to address deficiencies in local or regional
emergency preparedness.
(b) The office shall identify which requests  from applicants, if fulfilled, will maximize the
state’s ability to respond to an emergency, taking into account considerations that  include
but are not limited to:
(A) The level of priority assigned to the requested  preparedness equipment type pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section;
(B) The level  of need for the requested preparedness equipment as demonstrated by the
applicant;
(C) The ability to use and maintain the  preparedness equipment as demonstrated by the
applicant;
(D) The types of emergency most likely to occur in the region where the applicant  is lo-
cated; and
(E) Whether the applicant has an alternative means  of acquiring the requested
preparedness equipment.
(c) The office shall issue  grants to applicants identified under paragraph (b) of this sub-
section after entering into grant agreements with the applicants as provided in  paragraph
(e) of this subsection. The office may  either purchase the requested preparedness equipment
for distribution to  a recipient or disburse funds to the recipient for the purchase of the re-
quested preparedness equipment.
(d) The  Public Contracting Code does not apply to the acquisition of preparedness equip-
ment by the office or by a recipient pursuant to this section. When acquiring  preparedness
equipment pursuant to this section,  the office and recipients shall use procurement methods
that are  impartial and transparent to the greatest extent feasible and are designed to maxi-
mize value to the State of Oregon.
(e) The office may not  disburse preparedness equipment or funds under this section un-
less the office and the intended recipient first enter into a grant  agreement. The grant
agreement:
(A) Shall require the recipient to maintain the preparedness equipment.
(B) Shall provide that, if  a recipient fails to adequately maintain preparedness equipment,
the recipient must relinquish possession of the preparedness equipment  or reimburse the
office for the cost of the preparedness equipment.
(C) Shall specify  that the office may conduct periodic inspections of the preparedness
equipment as described in paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(D) Shall specify that preparedness equipment distributed to the recipient remains the
property of the office until it is  fully depreciated under governmental accounting principles,
after which the office may offer the preparedness equipment for sale to the recipient at its
fair market value at the time of sale.
(E) May permit the recipient to use the  preparedness equipment for any purpose, gov-
ernmental or otherwise, that is  permissible for assets financed with tax-exempt bonds, in-
cluding nonemergency purposes.
(F) Shall require private organizations to obtain approval from the office before  making
any use of preparedness equipment that is outside the scope  of the purpose of the private
organization as stated in the formation documents or bylaws of the organization.
(G) Shall  require the recipient to take action or refrain from action as necessary to
maintain federal tax benefits related to any tax-exempt bonds that are used to fund the grant
Enrolled House Bill 2687 (HB 2687-A) Page 2
and to indemnify the State of Oregon for any costs, expenses or liability due to  loss of such
federal tax benefits caused by action or inaction of the recipient.
(f) The office shall conduct periodic inspections of preparedness  equipment distributed
or purchased through the grant program to ensure that recipients are  adequately maintain-
ing the preparedness equipment. If the office finds  that any preparedness equipment is not
adequately maintained, the office may take possession of the preparedness equipment  or re-
quire the recipient to reimburse the office for the cost of the preparedness equipment.
(g) The office  may transfer between recipients, dispose of or otherwise manage the
preparedness equipment as it determines is in the best interests  of meeting the emergency
preparedness needs of the State  of Oregon. If the office disposes of preparedness equipment
for any reason, including sale  to a recipient as provided in paragraph (e)(D) of this sub-
section, the office shall deposit any moneys it  receives from the disposal in the Resiliency
Grant Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) On or before December 31 of each year, the office shall  submit a report to the Leg-
islative Assembly and to the Oregon Homeland  Security Council that describes the adminis-
tration and effectiveness  of the grant program established under this section and the current
prioritized list of preparedness equipment types.
(5) The  office shall adopt rules to administer and implement the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 2. The Resiliency Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Resiliency Grant Fund must be
credited to the fund. The Resiliency Grant Fund consists of moneys deposited in the  fund
under section 1 of this 2017 Act and may include moneys  appropriated, allocated, deposited
or transferred to  the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on
moneys in the fund.  The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Office of
Emergency Management for the purposes specified in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2687 (HB 2687-A) Page 3